Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7 Foundation Level School Support
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-7-1 — 16-7-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3419, §§ 1-5, 7, 8; G.L. 1956, §§

16-7-1

—

16-7-1

4; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 68, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-7-15.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of §§

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

is to provide a quality education for all Rhode Island youth by requiring a minimum per pupil expenditure level, by encouraging school committees to provide superior education beyond this minimum, by identifying fiscal responsibilities of school committees, by further improving the efficiency of our school systems through encouraging small school districts to combine into larger, more efficient regionalized units, and by incorporating the many various state aids into one comprehensive program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 1.

16-7-16.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in §§

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

have the following meanings:

“Adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation” means the equalized weighted assessed valuation of a community as determined by the department of revenue or as apportioned by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-21

.

“Average daily membership” means the average number of pupils in a community during a school year as determined pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-22

, less any students who are served in a program operated by the state and funded through the permanent foundation education aid formula pursuant to chapter 7.2 of this title.

For FY 2022, “average daily membership” means the greater of the average number of pupils in a community during a school year as determined pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-22

in March 2020 or March 2021, less any students who are served in a program operated by the state and funded through the permanent foundation education aid formula pursuant to chapter 7.2 of this title. State aid to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center shall be determined based on the districts of residence in whichever year had the greater total average daily membership.

For the purposes of determining the number of students in poverty, the department shall divide the average daily membership of students reported as living in poverty in each district of residence by the total average daily membership of students enrolled in the district of residence in both March 2020 and March 2021. The greater percentage shall be applied to the average daily membership used in the calculation of foundation education aid. For charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center, the average daily membership of students reported as living in poverty shall be consistent with March 2020 or March 2021, whichever year had the greater total average daily membership.

If the average daily membership in March 2020 is greater for any given community than in March 2021, the number of pupils shall be reduced by the number of students attending new or expanding charter schools in FY 2022.

For FY 2023, “average daily membership” means the greater of the average number of pupils in a community during a school year as determined pursuant to the provisions of § 16-7-22 in March 2020, March 2021, or March 2022, less any students who are served in a program operated by the state and funded through the permanent foundation education aid formula pursuant to chapter 7.2 of this title. State aid to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center shall be determined based on the districts of residence in whichever year had the greater total average daily membership.

For the purposes of determining the number of students in poverty, the department shall divide the average daily membership of students reported as living in poverty in each district of residence by the total average daily membership of students enrolled in the district of residence in March 2020, March 2021, and March 2022. The greater percentage shall be applied to the average daily membership used in the calculation of foundation education aid. For charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center, the average daily membership of students reported as living in poverty shall be consistent with March 2020, March 2021, or March 2022, whichever year had the greater total average daily membership.

If the average daily membership in March 2020 is greater for any given community than in March 2021 and March 2022, the number of pupils shall be reduced by the number of students attending new or expanding charter schools in FY 2022 and FY 2023.

If the average daily membership in March 2021 is greater for any given community than in March 2022, the number of pupils shall be reduced by the number of students attending new or expanding charter schools in FY 2023.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(iii) above, for FY 2023 only, for any local education agency in which the calculation of aid under subsection (2)(i) of this section and §

16-7-20(a)

would be greater than the calculation of aid under subsection (2)(iii) of this section, such local education agency shall receive an additional appropriation equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the difference in aid that would have been received under subsection (2)(i) of this section. The additional appropriation shall be as follows:

Barrington - $302,169

East Greenwich - $148,478

Exeter - $106,335

North Smithfield - $30,508

Richmond - $502

Smithfield - $75,374

Beacon Charter School - $22,731

Blackstone Academy - $11,212

Village Green Charter School - $1,073

Davies Career and Technical School - $2,808

“Basic education program” means the cost of education of resident pupils in grades twelve (12) and below in average daily membership for the reference year as determined by the mandated minimum program level.

“Certified personnel” means all persons who are required to hold certificates issued by or under the authority of the council on elementary and secondary education.

“Community” means any city, town, or regional school district established pursuant to law and/or the department of children, youth and families; provided, however, that the department of children, youth and families shall not have those administrative responsibilities and obligations as set forth in chapter 2 of this title; provided, however, that the member towns of the Chariho regional high school district, created by P.L. 1958, ch. 55 as amended, shall constitute separate and individual communities for the purpose of determining and distributing the foundation level school support including state aid for noncapital excess expenses for the special education of children with disabilities provided for in §

16-24-6

for all grades financed in whole or in part by the towns irrespective of any regionalization and any school operated by the state department of elementary and secondary education.

“Department of children, youth and families” means that department created pursuant to chapter 72 of title 42. For purposes of this section, §§

16-7-20

,

16-24-2

, and

42-72-5(b)(22)

, “children” means those children who are placed, assigned, or otherwise accommodated for residence by the department of children, youth and families in a state operated or supported community residence licensed by a state agency and the residence operates an educational program approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

“Equalized weighted assessed valuation” means the equalized weighted assessed valuation for a community as determined by the division of property valuation pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-21

.

“Full time equivalency students” means the time spent in a particular activity divided by the amount of time in a normal school day.

“Incentive entitlement” means the sum payable to a local school district under the formula used.

“Mandated minimum program level” means the amount that shall be spent by a community for every pupil in average daily membership as determined pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-18

.

“Reference year” means the next year prior to the school year immediately preceding that in which the aid is to be paid. For the purposes of calculating the permanent foundation education formula aid as described in §

16-7.2-3

, the reference date shall be one year prior to the year in which aid is paid.

“Regularly employed” and “service” as applied to certified personnel have the same meaning as defined in chapter 16 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 170, § 2; 1975, ch. 260, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 10; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 24; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 24; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 1, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

16-7-17.
Time of payment of state’s share of the basic program and approved expenditures.

There shall be paid by the state to each community in twelve (12) monthly installments an amount as determined by law to be the state’s share of the cost of the basic program for the reference year and all approved expenditures in excess of the basic program for the reference year, provided, however, that these payments to a community shall be reduced by the amount of funds deposited by the department into the local education agency EPSDT account in accordance with §

40-8-18

on behalf of the community. The July payment shall be two and fifty-four hundredths percent (2.54%) of the state’s share based upon the estimated pupil data, valuation data, and expenditure data for the reference year and the August through June payments shall each be eight and eighty-six hundredths percent (8.86%) of the aid due and payable based upon the data for the reference year, except for the city of East Providence which shall be paid during October and April in accordance with chapter 344 of the Public Laws of 1982.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 289, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 79, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 5.

16-7-18.
Determination of mandated minimum program level.

The mandated minimum program level shall be determined annually by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education upon recommendation of the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 4.

16-7-19.
Computation of standard local tax rate.

The standard local tax rate required to support the basic program shall be forty percent (40%).

The statewide local tax rate to be used in calculating each community’s share under §

16-7-20

shall be fifty percent (50%).

Fifty percent (50%) of the difference resulting from the difference between the rate presented in subsection (a) and the rate presented in subsection (b) shall be used in accordance with §

16-5-31

and fifty percent (50%) of the difference shall be allocated annually by the general assembly, upon recommendation of the commissioner and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, for one or more of the programs listed in §

16-69-2

.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of those sums or any portions of those sums as may be required from time to time upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

If the sums appropriated are not sufficient to implement subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, then the amount appropriated shall first be utilized to implement subsection (b) of this section. If the sums are not sufficient, then the amount shall be ratably reduced. Amounts remaining after full funding of subsection (b) of this section shall be apportioned among school districts for the purpose of subsection (c) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 5; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 5; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. XII, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 182, §§ 5, 6; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 84; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 10; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31.

16-7-19.1.
Optional incentive plan.

Any school committee in a municipality, or regional school district with an elected school committee, may by resolution to the retirement board, and the chief executive officer in any municipality with an appointed school committee may by order to the retirement board, as a result of a bargaining agreement with its teacher employees, accept an incentive plan to provide supplemental payments for teachers who are eligible for a service retirement allowance at the time they retire, or who become eligible for a service retirement allowance subsequent to their retirement, as follows: As an incentive to retire, the school committee shall grant no later than thirty (30) days following retirement a lump sum payment not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each year of service in that community, up to a maximum of thirty (30) years of service.

Each teacher must notify the school committee by July 1 of the year in which they intend to retire. The incentive payment shall be paid to the teacher no later than thirty (30) days following retirement or at the time they become eligible for a service retirement allowance and no retirement contribution shall be made from this payment.

Incentive payments under the plan shall not be included in the final salary of a teacher for the computation of the basic pension due from the retirement plan and the supplemental amount shall be computed as a separate item based on the existing pension formula, including three (3) year average, and the supplemental payment shall then be added to the teacher’s basic pension amount.

Supplemental payments under this section shall be applied, in the case of an option, after the option annuity amount is determined, and shall be continued for the lifetime of the teacher only and not to a beneficiary.

Supplemental payments under this section shall not be included in the original pension allowance subject to any cost of living increase provided by §

16-16-40

.

The total of all supplemental payments to retired teachers under this section shall be reimbursed to the retirement board by the school districts on a monthly basis. Whenever any amounts due are not paid within thirty (30) days from the date due, the board shall levy regular interest on the payments from date due to date of payment.

Any school committee in a municipality or regional school district with an elected school committee may terminate the optional incentive plan by resolution to the retirement board and the chief executive officer of a municipality with an appointed school committee may terminate the optional incentive plan by order to the retirement board, provided that:

No teacher who retires after the termination of the plan shall be eligible for any incentive or supplemental payments.

Any retired teacher who is receiving supplemental payments prior to the termination of the plan shall continue to receive payments for the remaining lifetime of the teacher, and the school district shall continue to be liable for the reimbursement of the payments to the retirement board as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 162, § 4; P.L. 1983, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 432, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 3.

16-7-20.
Determination of state’s share.

For each community the state’s share shall be computed as follows: Let

Then the state share entitlement for the community shall be RE where

R = 1 – 0.5vM/(Vm) through June 30, 2011, and R = 1 – 0.475 vM/(Vm) beginning on July 1, 2011 and thereafter.

Except that in no case shall R be less than zero percent (0%).

Whenever any funds are appropriated for educational purposes, the funds shall be used for educational purposes only and all state funds appropriated for educational purposes must be used to supplement any and all money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes and in no event shall state funds be used to supplant, directly or indirectly, any money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes. The courts of this state shall enforce this section by writ of mandamus.

Notwithstanding the calculations in subsection (a), the hospital school at the Hasbro Children’s Hospital shall be reimbursed one hundred percent (100%) of all expenditures approved by the council on elementary and secondary education in accordance with currently existing rules and regulations for administering state aid, and subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly including, but not limited to, expenditures for educational personnel, supplies, and materials in the prior fiscal year.

In the event the computation of the state’s share for any local education agency as outlined in subsection (a) is determined to have been calculated incorrectly after the state budget for that fiscal year has been enacted, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall notify affected local education agencies, the senate president, and the speaker of the house within fifteen (15) days of the determination.

Realignment of aid payments to the affected local education agencies pursuant to subsection (d) shall occur in the following fiscal year:

If the determination shows aid is underpaid to the local education agency, any amounts owed shall be paid in equal monthly installments.

If the determination shows aid was overpaid, the department of elementary and secondary education shall recapture some amount of the aid from the overpaid local education agency. The amount to be withheld shall be equal to the amount of the overpayment prorated to the number of full months remaining in the fiscal year when the notification required in subsection (d) was made.

The above notwithstanding, in no event shall the total paid to a local education agency in the 2023 fiscal year pursuant to subsection (a) be reduced as a result of the implementation of subsection (e); provided, however, that for the 2022 fiscal year, the full amount of any payment due to an underpayment and realignment under subsection (e)(1) shall be made for fiscal year 2022.

Data used for the calculation of the FY 2022 state share ratio shall also be used for the calculation of the FY 2023 state share ratio.

R = state share ratio for the community. v = adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation for the community, as defined in . §

16-7-21(3)

V = sum of the values of v for all communities. m = average daily membership of pupils in the community as defined in . §

16-7-22(3)

M = total average daily membership of pupils in the state. E = approved reimbursable expenditures for the community for the reference year minus the excess costs of special education, tuitions, federal and state receipts, and other income.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 6; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 1973, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 198, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 234, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 5; P.L. 1980, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. XII, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 9; P.L. 1987, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 10; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 53, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

16-7-20.1.
Annual report of number of children with disabilities receiving support.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall annually report on the first day of September to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education the number of children with disabilities affected by §

16-7-20

and the educational program costs for the children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 24; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 24; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 21.

16-7-20.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 6; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.

16-7-20.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.

16-7-20.4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 32, effective July 6, 2001.

16-7-20.5.
Computation of regionalization bonus.

For each regional school district, a state share shall be computed and multiplied by the reference year cost, as defined under §

16-7-16(11)

, of the basic program, as defined under §

16-7-16(3)

. The state share shall equal two percent (2%) for each grade so consolidated for the first two (2) years of operation, diminishing thereafter by one-fourth of one percent (1/4%) per grade per year, but in no event shall the increased percentage be less than eight percent (8%); provided further, that the individual communities in the Chariho regional districts shall each receive the applicable increased percentage of those grades serviced by the regional school district. Reimbursement payments as calculated under this section shall be made in accordance with the monthly distribution defined under §

16-7-20(c)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31.

16-7-20.6, 16-7-20.7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 32, effective July 6, 2001.

16-7-21.
Determination and adjustment of equalized weighted assessed valuation.

On or before August 1 of each year the division of property valuation within the department of revenue shall determine and certify to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education the equalized weighted assessed valuation for each city and town in the following manner:

The total assessed valuations of real and tangible personal property for each city and town as of December 31 of the third preceding calendar year shall be weighted by bringing the valuation to the true and market value of real and tangible personal property. The total assessed valuations of real and tangible personal property for all cities and towns shall be applied to the true and market valuations of the property for all cities and towns and the resulting percentage shall determine the average throughout the state. This percentage applied to the sum of the total true and market value of real and tangible personal property of each city and town shall be the equalized weighted assessed valuation of each city and town.

The equalized weighted assessed valuation for each city and town shall be allocated to the particular city or town, and in the case of a regional school district that does not service all grades, except the Chariho regional high school district, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall apportion that proportion of the equalized weighted assessed valuation of the member cities or towns that the average daily membership serviced by the regional school district bears to the total average daily membership, and the equalized weighted assessed valuation of the member cities and towns shall be appropriately reduced.

The equalized weighted assessed valuation for each community as allocated or apportioned in accordance with subsection (2) shall be adjusted by the ratio that the median family income of a city or town bears to the statewide median family income as reported in the latest available federal census data. The total state adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation shall be the same as the total state equalized weighted assessed valuation.

In the event that certified data is later determined to be incorrect, the division of property valuation, in conjunction with the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, shall inform local education agencies, the senate president, and the speaker of the house of the issue(s) within five (5) days of the determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 7; P.L. 1961, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 1975, ch. 260, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-22.
Determination of average daily membership.

Each community shall be paid pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7-17

an amount based upon the following provisions:

On or before September 1 of each year the average daily membership of each city and town for the reference year shall be determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education from data supplied by the school committee in each community in the following manner: The aggregate number of days of membership of all pupils enrolled full time in grade twelve (12) and below, except that pupils below grade one who are not full time shall be counted on a full-time equivalent basis: (i) Increased by the aggregate number of days of membership of pupils residing in the particular city or town whose tuition in schools approved by the department of elementary and secondary education in other cities and towns is paid by the particular city or town; and (ii) Decreased by the aggregate number of days of membership of nonresident pupils enrolled in the public schools of the particular city or town and further decreased by the aggregate number of days of membership equal to the number of group home beds calculated for the purposes of reimbursement pursuant to §

16-64-1.1

; and (iii) Decreased further, in the case of a city or town that is a member of a regional school district during the first year of operation of the regional school district by the aggregate number of days of membership of pupils residing in the city or town who would have attended the public schools in the regional school district if the regional school district had been operating during the previous year, divided by the number of days during which the schools were officially in session during the reference year. The resulting figures shall be the average, daily membership for the city or town for the reference year. For purposes of calculating the permanent foundation education aid as described in § 16-7.2-3(1) and (2), the average, daily membership for school districts shall exclude charter school and state school students, and beginning in school year 2014-2015, include an estimate to ensure that districts converting from a half-day to a full-day kindergarten program pursuant to §

16-99-4

are credited on a full-time basis beginning in the first year of enrollment and are funded notwithstanding the transition plan pursuant to §

16-7.2-7

.

The average daily membership of pupils attending public schools shall apply for the purposes of determining the percentage of the state’s share under the provisions of §§

16-7-16(3)

,

16-7-16(10)

,

16-7-18

,

16-7-19

,

16-7-20

,

16-7-21

and

16-7.2-4

.

In the case of regional school districts, the aggregate number of days of membership by which each city or town is decreased in subdivision (1)(iii) of this section, divided by the number of days during which the schools attended by the pupils were officially in session, shall determine the average daily membership for the regional school district during the first year of operation. After the first year of operation, the average, daily membership of each regional school district, except the Chariho regional high school district, shall be determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education from data supplied by the school committee of each regional school district for the reference year in the manner provided in subdivision (1) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 8; P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 1972, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1989, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 358, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 456, § 1.

16-7-23.
Community requirements — Adequate minimum budget provision.

The school committee’s budget provisions of each community for current expenditures in each budget year shall provide for an amount from all sources sufficient to support the basic program and all other approved programs shared by the state. Each community shall contribute local funds to its school committee in an amount not less than its local contribution for schools in the previous fiscal year except to the extent permitted by §§

16-7-23.1

and

16-7-23.2

. Provided, that for the fiscal years 2010 and 2011 each community shall contribute to its school committee in an amount not less than ninety-five percent (95.0%) of its local contribution for schools for the fiscal year 2009. Calculation of the annual local contribution shall not include Medicaid revenues received by the municipality or district pursuant to chapter 8 of title 40. A community that has a decrease in enrollment may compute maintenance of effort on a per-pupil rather than on an aggregate basis when determining its local contribution; furthermore, a community that experiences a nonrecurring expenditure for its schools may deduct the nonrecurring expenditure in computing its maintenance of effort. The deduction of nonrecurring expenditures shall be with the approval of the commissioner. Provided, however, that notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, debt service that is no longer carried on the books of any school district shall not be included in any school district’s annual budget, nor shall nonrecurring debt service be included in maintenance of effort as set forth in this chapter, nor shall any nonrecurring debt service be included in the operating budget of any school district. For the purposes set forth above, nonrecurring capital lease payments shall be considered nonrecurring debt service. The courts of this state shall enforce this section by means of injunctive relief.

Districts’ annual maintenance expenditures must meet the requirements of subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) of this section.

A minimum of three percent (3%) of the operating budget shall be dedicated exclusively for maintenance expenditures as defined in §

16-7-36(7)

provided that for FY 2019, that amount shall be one percent (1%), for FY 2020, that amount shall be one and one-half percent (1.5%), for FY 2021 that amount shall be two percent (2%), and for FY 2022 that amount shall be two and one-half percent (2.5%).

A minimum of three percent (3%) of the replacement value shall be dedicated exclusively for maintenance expenditures as defined in §

16-7-36(7)

provided that for FY 2019, that amount shall be one percent (1%), for FY 2020 that amount shall be one and one-half percent (1.5%), for FY 2021 that amount shall be two percent (2%), and for FY 2022 that amount shall be two and one-half percent (2.5%).

A minimum of three dollars ($3.00), subject to inflation, per square foot of building space shall be dedicated exclusively for maintenance expenditures as defined in § 16-7-36(7).

The department of elementary and secondary education shall be responsible for establishing a reporting mechanism to ensure the intent of this section is being met. In the event that a district does not meet its minimum expenditure requirement in a given year, the state shall direct state housing aid paid pursuant to §

16-7-41

or §

16-105-5

, in an amount equal to the shortfall, to a restricted fund created by the district and dedicated solely to meeting maintenance requirements.

Whenever any state funds are appropriated for educational purposes, the funds shall be used for educational purposes only and all state funds appropriated for educational purposes must be used to supplement any and all money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes and, in no event, shall state funds be used to supplant, directly or indirectly, any money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes. All state funds shall be appropriated by the municipality to the school committee for educational purposes in the same fiscal year in which they are appropriated at the state level even if the municipality has already adopted a school budget. All state and local funds unexpended by the end of the fiscal year of appropriation shall remain a surplus of the school committee and shall not revert to the municipality. Any surplus of state or local funds appropriated for educational purposes shall not in any respect affect the requirement that each community contribute local funds in an amount not less than its local contribution for schools in the previous fiscal year, subject to subsection (a) of this section, and shall not in any event be deducted from the amount of the local appropriation required to meet the maintenance of effort provision in any given year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 4; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-23.1.
Special maintenance of effort rules for high local contribution and high per pupil expenditure communities.

Any community that has a local appropriation that funds at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the basic education program shall be defined as a high local contribution community. A high local contribution community that has provided full funding of the basic education program and all other approved programs required in law and regulation is authorized to reduce its local appropriation to schools by an amount up to ten percent (10%) of any increase it receives in state school funds, pursuant to the implementation of the permanent foundation education aid formula as defined in §

16-7.2-3

.

Any community that has a local appropriation that combined with state education aid provides full funding of the basic education program and exceeds the benchmarks established by the department of elementary and secondary education for costs outside the permanent foundation education aid formula, pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

, including but not limited to transportation, facility maintenance, and retiree health care, shall be defined as a high per pupil expenditure community. A high per pupil expenditure community is authorized to reduce its local appropriation to schools by an amount up to ten percent (10%) of any increase it receives in state school funds, pursuant to the implementation of the permanent foundation education aid formula as defined in §

16-7.2-3

.

Upon request of the local community, and for good cause shown, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may grant variances to subsection (a) and (b) if the commissioner finds that such adjustment does not disrupt the continued effective operation of the public school system of the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1.

16-7-23.2.
School deficit reduction — Maintenance of effort provision.

A city, town, or regional school district appropriating authority may appropriate supplemental funds to eliminate or reduce a school budget deficit. To the extent that such a supplemental appropriation represents payment of past annual expenditure, the payment shall not be used in the computation of the maintenance of effort requirements established by §

16-7-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 7.

16-7-24.
Minimum appropriation by a community for approved school expenses.

Each community shall appropriate or otherwise make available to the school committee for approved school expenditures during each school year, to be expended under the direction and supervision of the school committee of that community, an amount, which, together with state education aid and federal aid: (1) shall be not less than the costs of the basic program during the reference year, (2) plus the costs in the reference year of all optional programs shared by the state; provided, however, that the state funds provided in accordance with §

16-5-31

shall not be used to supplant local funds. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall adopt regulations for determining the basic education program and the maintenance of local appropriation to support the basic education program. A community that has a local appropriation insufficient to fund the basic education program pursuant to the regulations described in this section and all other approved programs shared by the state and required in law shall be required to increase its local appropriation in accordance with §

44-5-2

or find efficiencies in other non-education programs to provide sufficient funding to support the public schools. The city of Central Falls annual local contribution to education shall be determined pursuant to subsection

16-7.2-6(d)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10; P.L. 1983, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 10; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1.

16-7-25.
Minimum program required.

The school committee in each community shall operate the schools each year on an appropriate level at least as adequate as the minimum established in §§

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10.

16-7-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10; Repealed by P.L. 1975, ch. 299, § 1.

16-7-27.
School tax rate to be identified.

The taxing authority in every city and town of the state shall record upon the individual tax notices the tax rate which is apportioned for school purposes separate from the tax rate which is apportioned for municipal purposes and the total of these two (2) tax rates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10.

16-7-28.
Separate revenue and expenditure records kept by school communities.

The communities shall provide for the keeping of separate revenue and expenditure records for all school purposes including capital expenditures on any forms and in any manner that the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10.